Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

31-31-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the establishment of police officers' and firefighters' pension plans in this state is a matter of statewide concern that affects the public safety and general welfare, that the ability of pension funds to pay earned benefits to present and future members is a necessary corollary to the establishment of pension plans, and that statewide pension plans establishing pension benefits that can be fully funded with local moneys will permit the continuation of pension plans for police officers and firefighters in this state. In addition, the general assembly declares that any pension plan must be actuarially sound in order to assure the security of the pension system and that this article is enacted to provide for the stability and security of police officers' and firefighters' pension plans in this state. The general assembly further declares that state moneys provided to municipalities, fire protection districts, and county improvement districts do not constitute a continuing obligation of the state to participate in the ongoing normal costs of pension plan benefits, except for state funding of death and disability benefits as specified in this article, but are provided in recognition that the local governments are currently burdened with financial obligations relating to pensions in excess of their present financial capacities. It is the intent of the general assembly in providing state moneys to assist the local governments that state participation decrease annually, terminating at the earliest possible date.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 893, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1001.

31-31-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Actuarially sound" means a police officers' or firefighters' pension fund determined by the board to be receiving or scheduled to receive employer and member contributions in each fiscal year equal to the annual contributions actuarially determined to be necessary to pay the annual current service cost of pension benefits attributable to active employees and to pay the annual contribution necessary to amortize any unfunded accrued liability over a period not to exceed forty years. The actuarial cost method to be utilized shall be the entry age-normal cost method. The date from which unfunded liabilities shall be amortized shall be determined pursuant to part 3 of article 30.5 of this title.

"Board" means the board of directors established as the governing body of the fire and police pension association as provided in section 31-31-201 (2).

"Employer" means any municipality in this state offering police or fire protection service employing one or more members and any special district, fire authority, or county improvement district in this state offering fire protection service employing one or more members.

"Member" means an active employee who is a full-time salaried employee of a municipality, fire protection district, fire authority, or county improvement district normally serving at least one thousand six hundred hours in any calendar year and whose duties are directly involved with the provision of police or fire protection, as certified by the member's employer. "Member" also includes an active employee who works less than sixteen hundred hours per year but otherwise qualifies as a member and whose employer elects to treat all such other similar employees as members. The term does not include clerical or other personnel whose services are auxiliary to police protection, or any volunteer firefighter, as such term is defined in section 31-30-1102 (9). For the purpose of participation in the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to part 4 of this article or the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article, but not for the purpose of participation in the statewide death and disability plan pursuant to part 8 of this article, the term may include clerical or other personnel employed by a fire protection district, fire authority, or county improvement district, whose services are auxiliary to fire protection. For the purpose of eligibility for disability or survivor benefits, "member" includes any employee on an authorized leave of absence.

"Money purchase plan" or "money purchase pension plan" means a retirement plan under which:

The employer has a fixed obligation to make an annual contribution to the plan;

The plan provides for an individual account for each member; and

The member's benefits are based solely on the amount contributed to the member's account and any income, expenses, gains, and losses allocated to the member's account.

"Retired member" means any member who is retired, disabled, or eligible for a benefit as provided in section 31-31-404 (2).

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 893, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(5) amended, p. 24, § 3, effective March 16.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 416, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1231, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1002 (1), (2), (4), (5), and (5.5).